Hawaii statutes.
§150A-6.4 Permit and other import document
issuance; requirements. Except as otherwise provided in this part, all
permits, letters of authorization, or registrations referenced in sections
150A-6 through 150A-6.3 shall be issued pursuant to rules. Any violation of
conditions listed on the permits, letters of authorization, or registrations
shall be a violation of this chapter. [L 2000, c 211, pt of §1; am L 2002, c
61, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next